Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.335.300

Playground matting.

Every school board of directors shall consider the purchase of playground matting manufactured from shredded waste tires in undertaking construction or maintenance of playgrounds. The department of enterprise services shall upon request assist in the development of product specifications and vendor identification.

[ 2015 c 225 s 27; 1991 c 297 s 18.]